Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3243
Districts; lands owned or controlled by state; preventive and control measures; powers.

Each district shall have the power and authority to carry out preventive and control measures within the district, including, but not limited to, engineering operations, methods of cultivation, the growing of vegetation, changes in use of land, and other measures as may be determined feasible on lands owned or controlled by this state or any of its agencies, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction thereof, and on any other lands within the district upon obtaining the consent of the owners of such lands or the necessary rights or interests in such lands.

Laws 1969, c. 9, § 43, p. 127.